Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 4

Competitive Wireless Broadband Investment, Deployment, and Safety Act of 2018

13-24-401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Competitive Wireless Broadband Investment, Deployment, and Safety Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

13-24-402. Part definitions.

As used in this part:

“Aesthetic plan” means any publicly available written resolution, regulation, policy, site plan, or approved plat establishing generally applicable aesthetic requirements within the authority or designated area within the authority. An aesthetic plan may include a provision that limits the plan's application to construction or deployment that occurs after adoption of the aesthetic plan. For purposes of this part, such a limitation is not discriminatory as long as all construction or deployment occurring after adoption, regardless of the entity constructing or deploying, is subject to the aesthetic plan;

“Applicant” means any person who submits an application pursuant to this part;

“Application” means a request submitted by an applicant to an authority:

For a permit to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities in the ROW; or

To approve the installation or modification of a PSS associated with deployment or colocation of small wireless facilities in the ROW;

“Authority” means:

Within a municipal boundary, the municipality, regardless of whether such municipality is a metropolitan government;

Within a county and outside a municipal boundary, the county; or

Upon state-owned property, the state;

“Authority” does not include a government-owned electric, gas, water, or wastewater utility that is a division of, or affiliated with, a municipality, metropolitan government, or county for any purpose of this part, and the decision of the utility regarding a request to attach to or modify the plant, facilities, or equipment owned by the utility shall not be governed by this part;

“Authority-owned PSS” means a PSS owned by an authority but does not include a PSS owned by a distributor of electric power, regardless of whether an electric distributor is investor-owned, cooperatively-owned, or government-owned;

“Colocate,” “colocating”, and “colocation” mean, in their respective noun and verb forms, to install, mount, maintain, modify, operate, or replace small wireless facilities on, adjacent to, or related to a PSS. “Colocation” does not include the installation of a new PSS or replacement of authority-owned PSS;

“Communications facility” means the set of equipment and network components, including wires and cables and associated facilities, used by a communications service provider to provide communications service;

“Communications service” means cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 522(6), telecommunications service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153(53), information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153(24) or wireless service;

“Communications service provider” means a cable operator as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 522(5), a telecommunications carrier as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153(51), a provider of information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 153(24), a video service provider as defined in § 7-59-303, or a wireless provider;

“Fee” means a one-time, nonrecurring charge;

“Historic district” means a property or area zoned as a historic district or zone pursuant to § 13-7-404;

“Local authority” means an authority that is either a municipality, regardless of whether the municipality is a metropolitan government, or a county, and does not include an authority that is the state;

“Micro wireless facility” means a small wireless facility that:

Does not exceed twenty-four inches (24") in length, fifteen inches (15") in width, and twelve inches (12") in height; and

The exterior antenna, if any, does not exceed eleven inches (11") in length;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association, trust, or other entity or organization, including an authority;

“Potential support structure for a small wireless facility” or “PSS” means a pole or other structure used for wireline communications, electric distribution, lighting, traffic control, signage, or a similar function, including poles installed solely for the colocation of a small wireless facility. When “PSS” is modified by the term “new,” then “new PSS” means a PSS that does not exist at the time the application is submitted, including, but not limited to, a PSS that will replace an existing pole. The fact that a structure is a PSS does not alone authorize an applicant to colocate on, modify, or replace the PSS until an application is approved and all requirements are satisfied pursuant to this part;

“Rate” means a recurring charge;

“Residential neighborhood” means an area within a local authority's geographic boundary that is zoned or otherwise designated by the local authority for general purposes as an area primarily used for single-family residences and does not include multiple commercial properties and is subject to speed limits and traffic controls consistent with residential areas;

“Right-of-way” or “ROW” means the space, in, upon, above, along, across, and over all public streets, highways, avenues, roads, alleys, sidewalks, tunnels, viaducts, bridges, skywalks under the control of the authority, and any unrestricted public utility easement established, dedicated, platted, improved, or devoted for utility purposes and accepted as such public utility easement by the authority, but excluding lands other than streets that are owned by the authority;

“Small wireless facility” means a wireless facility with:

An antenna that could fit within an enclosure of no more than six (6) cubic feet in volume; and

Other wireless equipment in addition to the antenna that is cumulatively no more than twenty-eight (28) cubic feet in volume, regardless of whether the facility is ground-mounted or pole-mounted. For purposes of this subdivision (19)(A)(ii), “other wireless equipment” does not include an electric meter, concealment element, telecommunications demarcation box, grounding equipment, power transfer switch, cut-off switch, or a vertical cable run for the connection of power and other services; and

“Small wireless facility” includes a micro wireless facility;

“Wireline backhaul facility” means a communications facility used to transport communications services by wire from a wireless facility to a network;

“Wireless facility” means equipment at a fixed location that enables wireless communications between user equipment and a communications network, including:

Equipment associated with wireless communications; and

Radio transceivers, antennas, coaxial or fiber-optic cable, regular and backup power supplies, and comparable equipment, regardless of technological configuration;

“Wireless facility” does not include:

The structure or improvements on, under, or within which the equipment is colocated;

Wireline backhaul facilities; or

Coaxial or fiber-optic cable that is between wireless structures or utility poles or that is otherwise not immediately adjacent to or directly associated with a particular antenna; and

“Wireless facility” includes small wireless facilities;

“Wireless provider” means a person who provides wireless service; and

“Wireless services” means any service using licensed or unlicensed spectrum, including the use of WiFi, whether at a fixed location or mobile, provided to the public.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

13-24-403. Construction and applicability of part.

This part shall be construed to maximize investment in wireless connectivity across the state by creating a uniform and predictable framework that limits local obstacles to deployment of small wireless facilities in the ROW and to encourage, where feasible, shared use of public infrastructure and colocation in a manner that is the most technology neutral and nondiscriminatory.

This part does not apply to:

Deployment of infrastructure outside of the ROW; or

Taller towers or monopoles traditionally used to provide wireless services that are governed by §§ 13-24-304 and 13-24-305.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

13-24-404. Local option and local preemption.

Nothing in this part requires any local authority to promulgate any limits, permitting requirements, zoning requirements, approval policies, or any process to obtain permission to deploy small wireless facilities. However, any local authority that promulgates limits, permitting requirements, zoning requirements, approval policies, or processes relative to deployment of small wireless facilities shall not impose limits, requirements, policies, or processes that are:

More restrictive than requirements, policies, or processes set forth in this part;

In excess of that which is granted by this part; or

Otherwise in conflict with this part.

Any local authority limits, requirements, policies, or processes that are more restrictive, in conflict with, or in excess of that which is granted by this part are void, regardless of the date on which the requirement, policy, or process was enacted or became law.

For colocation of small wireless facilities in the ROW that is within the jurisdiction of a local authority that does not require an application and does not require work permits for deployment of infrastructure within the ROW, an applicant shall provide notice of the colocation by providing the materials set forth in § 13-24-409(g) to the office of the county mayor and the chief administrative officer of the county highway department, if the colocation is in the unincorporated area, or the city, if the colocation is in an incorporated area.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

13-24-405. Existing law unaffected.

This part does not:

Create regulatory jurisdiction for any subdivision of the state regarding communications services that does not exist under applicable law, regardless of the technology used to deliver the services;

Restrict access granted by § 65-21-201 or expand access authorized under § 54-16-112;

Authorize the creation of local taxation in the form of ROW taxes, rates, or fees that exceed the cost-based fees authorized under existing law, except that the specific fees or rates established pursuant to this part do not exceed cost;

Alter or exempt any entity from the franchising requirements for providing video services or cable services set forth in title 7, chapter 59;

Apply to any segment of the statewide P25 interoperable communications system governed by § 4-3-2018;

Alter the requirements or exempt any entity from the requirements to relocate facilities, including any PSS, small wireless facility, or other related infrastructure, to the same extent as any facility pursuant to title 54, chapter 5, part 8, or other similar generally applicable requirement imposed on entities who deploy infrastructure in ROW;

Prohibit a local authority from the nondiscriminatory enforcement of breakaway sign post requirements and safety restrictions generally imposed for all structures within a ROW;

Prohibit a local authority from the nondiscriminatory enforcement of vegetation control requirements that are imposed upon entities that deploy infrastructure in a ROW for the purpose of limiting the chances of damage or injury as a result of infrastructure that is obscured from view due to vegetation; or

Prohibit a local authority from the nondiscriminatory enforcement of generally applicable local rules regarding removal of unsafe, abandoned, or inoperable obstructions in a ROW.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

13-24-406. Prohibited activities.

An authority shall not:

Enter into an exclusive arrangement with any person for use of a ROW for the construction, operation, marketing, or maintenance of small wireless facilities;

Discriminate by prohibiting an applicant from making any type of installation that is generally permitted when performed by other entities entitled to deploy infrastructure in a ROW or by imposing any maintenance or repair obligations not generally applicable to all entities entitled to deploy infrastructure in a ROW;

Impose discriminatory prohibitions against deploying a new PSS for small wireless facilities in a ROW. Only requirements imposed generally to other entities entitled to deploy infrastructure in a ROW may be applied to prohibit an applicant's deployment of a new PSS in a ROW; or

Except as provided in this part or otherwise specifically authorized by state law, adopt or enforce any regulations or requirements on the placement or operation of communications facilities in a ROW by a communications service provider authorized by state or local law to operate in a ROW; regulate any communications services; or impose or collect any tax, fee, or charge for the provision of communications service over the communications service provider's communications facilities in a ROW.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

13-24-407. Uniform local authority fees for deployment of small wireless facilities — Exceptions.

The following are the maximum fees and rates that may be charged to an applicant by a local authority for deployment of a small wireless facility:

The maximum application fee is one hundred dollars ($100) each for the first five (5) small wireless facilities and fifty dollars ($50.00) each for additional small wireless facilities included in a single application. A local authority may also require an additional fee of two hundred dollars ($200) on the first application an applicant files following April 24, 2018 to offset the local authority's initial costs of preparing to comply with this part. Beginning on January 1, 2020, and at each five-year interval thereafter, the maximum application fees established in this section must increase in an amount of ten percent (10%), rounded to the nearest dollar; and

The maximum annual rate for colocation of a small wireless facility on a local authority-owned PSS is one hundred dollars ($100).

In addition to the maximum fees and rates described in subsection (a), a local authority shall not require applicants:

To pay fees or reimburse costs for the services or assistance provided to the authority by a consultant or third party retained by the authority relative to deployment of small wireless facilities; or

To file additional applications or permits for regular maintenance, replacement of, or repairs made to an applicant's own facilities. In no event shall replacement of a PSS constitute regular maintenance.

This section does not prohibit an authority from requiring generally applicable work or traffic permits, or from collecting the same applicable fees for such permits, for deployment of a small wireless facility or new PSS as long as the work or traffic permits are issued and associated fees are charged on the same basis as other construction activity in a ROW.

This section does not prohibit an authority from retaining any consultant or third party when the fees and costs for the consultant or third party are paid by the authority, using the authority's own funds, rather than requiring applicants to reimburse or pay for the consultants or third parties.

Except for the application fees, permit fees, and colocation rates set out in this section, no local authority shall require additional rates or fees of any kind, including, but not limited to, rental fees, access fees, or site license fees for the initial deployment or the continuing presence of a small wireless facility.

No local authority shall require approval, or any applications, fees, or rates, for:

Routine maintenance of a small wireless facility, which maintenance does not require the installation of a new PSS or the replacement of a PSS;

The replacement of a small wireless facility with another small wireless facility that is the same size or smaller than the size conditions set out in the definition of “small wireless facility” in § 13-24-402; or

The installation, placement, maintenance, operation, or replacement of a micro wireless facility that is suspended on cables that are strung between existing PSSs, in compliance with the National Electrical Safety Code as set out in § 68-101-104.

No local authority shall require execution of any access agreement or site license agreement as a condition of deployment of a small wireless facility in a ROW.

A local authority shall not directly or indirectly require an applicant to perform services for the authority or provide goods to the authority such as in-kind contributions to the authority, including, but not limited to, reserving fiber, conduit, or pole space for the authority in exchange for deployment of small wireless facilities. The prohibition in this subdivision (e)(4) does not preclude the approval of an application to colocate a small cell in which the applicant chooses, in its sole discretion, a design that accommodates other functions or attributes of benefit to the authority.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.

13-24-408. Uniform local authority requirements for deployment and maintenance of small wireless facilities — Exceptions.

No local authority shall restrict the size, height, or otherwise regulate the appearance or placement of small wireless facilities, or prohibit colocation on PSSs, except a local authority shall require that:

A new PSS installed or an existing PSS replaced in the ROW not exceed the greater of:

Ten feet (10') in height above the tallest existing PSS in place as of April 24, 2018 that is located within five hundred feet (500') of the new PSS in the ROW and, in residential neighborhoods, the tallest existing PSS that is located within five hundred feet (500') of the new PSS and is also located within the same residential neighborhood as the new PSS in the ROW;

Fifty feet (50') above ground level; or

For a PSS installed in a residential neighborhood, forty feet (40') above ground level;

Small wireless facilities deployed in the ROW after April 24, 2018 shall not extend:

More than ten feet (10') above an existing PSS in place as of April 24, 2018; or

On a new PSS, ten feet (10') above the height permitted for a new PSS under this section.

Nothing in this part applies to or restricts the ability of an electric distributor or its agent or designated party to change the height of a utility pole used for electric distribution, regardless of whether a small wireless facility is colocated on the utility pole. This section does not authorize a wireless provider to install or replace a PSS above the height restrictions in subdivision (a)(1)(A).

An applicant may construct, modify, and maintain a PSS or small wireless facility that exceeds the height limits set out in subdivision (a)(1) only if approved under the local authority's generally applicable zoning regulations that expressly allow for the taller structures or if approved pursuant to a zoning appeal.

A local authority may require an applicant to comply with a local authority's nondiscriminatory requirements for placing all electric, cable, and communications facilities underground in a designated area of a ROW if the local authority:

Has required all electric, communications, and cable facilities, other than authority-owned PSSs and attachments, to be placed underground prior to the date on which the application is submitted;

Does not prohibit the replacement of authority-owned PSSs in the designated area when the design for the new PSS meets the authority's design aesthetic plan for the area and all other applicable criteria provided for in this part; and

Permits applicants to seek a waiver of the underground requirements for the placement of a new PSS to support small wireless facilities and the approval or nonapproval of the waivers are decided in a nondiscriminatory manner.

Except for facilities excluded from evaluation for effects on historic properties under 47 C.F.R. § 1.1307(a)(4) or any subsequently enacted similar regulations, a local authority may require reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and technology neutral design or concealment measures in a historic district if:

The design or concealment measures do not have the effect of prohibiting any applicant's technology or substantially reducing the functionality of the small wireless facility, and the local authority permits alternative design or concealment measures that are reasonably similar; and

The design or concealment measures are not considered a part of the small wireless facility for purposes of the size conditions contained in the definition of “small wireless facility” in § 13-24-402.

Nothing in this section limits a local authority's enforcement of historic preservation zoning regulations consistent with the preservation of local zoning authority under 47 U.S.C. § 332(c)(7), the requirements for facility modifications under 47 U.S.C. § 1455(a), or the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 (54 U.S.C. § 300101 et seq.), and the regulations adopted and amended from time to time to implement those laws.

No local authority shall require network design for small wireless facilities, including mandating the selection of any specific PSS or category of PSS to which an applicant must attach any part of its network. No local authority shall limit the placement of small wireless facilities by imposing minimum separation distances for small wireless facilities or the structures on which the facilities are colocated. The prohibitions in this subsection (d) do not preclude a local authority from providing general guidance regarding preferred designs or from requesting consideration of design alternatives in accordance with the process set forth in § 13-24-409(b).

A local authority may prohibit colocation on local authority-owned PSSs that are identified as PSSs the mast arms of which are routinely removed to accommodate frequent events, including, but not limited to, regularly scheduled street festivals or parades. To qualify for the exception set out in this subsection (e), an authority must publish a list of the PSSs on its website and may prohibit colocation only if the PSS has been designated and published as an exception prior to an application. A local authority may grant a waiver to allow colocation on a PSS designated under this subsection (e) if an applicant demonstrates that its design for colocation will not interfere with the operation of the PSS and otherwise meets all other requirements of this part.

An applicant may replace an existing local authority-owned PSS when colocating a small wireless facility. When replacing a PSS, any replacement PSS must reasonably conform to the design aesthetics of the PSS being replaced, and must continue to be capable of performing the same function in a comparable manner as it performed prior to replacement.

When replacing a local authority-owned PSS, the replacement PSS becomes the property of the local authority and maintenance and repair obligations are as follows:

For local authority-owned PSSs used for lighting, a local authority may require the applicant to provide lighting on the replacement PSS. Both the PSS and the lighting shall become the property of the local authority only upon completion of the local authority's inspection of the new PSS to ensure it is in working condition and that any lighting is equivalent to the quality and standards of the lighting on the PSS prior to replacement. After satisfactory inspection, the local authority's ownership shall include responsibility for electricity and ordinary maintenance, but the local authority shall not be responsible for electric power, maintenance or repair of the small wireless facility colocated on the local authority-owned PSS; and

When the applicant's design for replacing a local authority-owned PSS substantially alters the PSS, then the applicant shall indicate in its application whether the applicant will manage maintenance and repairs in case of damage or whether the applicant agrees that, if the PSS is damaged and requires repair, then the local authority may replace the PSS without regard to the alterations and require the applicant to perform any work necessary to remove or dispose of the small wireless facility. If the applicant assumes the responsibility for repair, then the applicant is entitled to a right of subrogation with regard to local authority insurance coverage or any recovery obtained from third parties liable for the damage.

A local authority may conduct periodic training sessions or seminars for the purpose of sharing local information relevant to deployment of small wireless facilities and best practices. Applicants must make a good faith effort to participate in the opportunities.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning supporting emerging wireless technologies, please refer to Acts 2018, ch. 819.

Acts 2018, ch. 819, § 4 provided that: (a) All applications to deploy or colocate small wireless facilities that are pending on April 24, 2018, shall be granted or denied consistent with the substantive requirements of this act within either ninety (90) days of April 24, 2018, or ninety (90) days from the date such applications were originally submitted, whichever is later.

For all applications submitted after April 24, 2018, but before July 1, 2018, the applicable review periods shall not begin to run until July 1, 2018. Beginning on July 1, 2018, and thereafter, the review periods established herein shall be calculated consistent with the actual date such applications are filed.